en: Abrasive
cs: Abrazivum
da: Slibende
de: Abrasiv
el: Λειοτριπτικό
es: Abrasivo
et: Abrasiiv
fr: Agent abrasif
hu: Koptató anyag
it: Abrasivo
lt: Abrazyvas
lv: Abrazīva viela
nl: Schuurmiddel
pl: Scierająca
pt: Abrasivo
sk: Abrazívna látka
sl: Abraziv
sv: Slipande

en: Absorbent
da: Absorberende
de: Absorbierend
el: Απορροφητικό
es: Absorbente
fi: Absorbentti
fr: Agent absorbant
hu: Abszorbens
it: Assorbente
lt: Absorbentas
lv: Absorbents
nl: Absorberend
pl: Wchłaniająca
pt: Absorvente
sv: Absorberande

en: Anticaking
cs: Protispékavá přísada
da: Antiklumpningsmiddel
de: Antibackmittel
el: Αντισυσσωματικό
es: Antiagregante
et: Paakumisvastane aine
fi: Paakkuuntumisenestoaine
fr: Agent antiagglomérant
hu: Összetapadás-gátló anyag
it: Antiagglomerante
lt: Skystiklis
lv: Pretsalipes viela
nl: Antiklonter
pl: Przeciwzbrylająca
pt: Antifloculante
sk: Protihrudkujúca látka
sl: Sredstvo proti sprijemanju
sv: Klumpförebyggande

en: Anticorrosive
cs: Antikorozivum
da: Rusthæmmer
de: Korrosionshemmend
el: Αντιδιαβρωτικό
es: Anticorrosivo
et: Korrosioonivastane aine
fi: Korroosiota estävä aine
fr: Agent anticorrosion
hu: Korróziógátló anyag
it: Anticorrosivo
lt: Antikorozinė medžiaga
lv: Pretkorozijas viela
nl: Anticorrosie
pl: Antykorozyjna
pt: Anticorrosivo
sk: Antikorózna látka
sl: Antikoroziv
sv: Korrosionshämmande

en: Antidandruff
cs: Přísada proti lupům
da: Mod skæl
de: Antischuppenwirkstoff
el: Αντιπιτυριδικό
es: Anticaspa
et: Kõõmavastane aine
fi: Hilsettä vähentävä aine
fr: Agent antipelliculaire
hu: Korpásodás elleni hatóanyag
it: Antiforfora
lt: Medžiaga nuo pleiskanojimo
lv: Pretblaugznu viela
nl: Antiroos
pl: Przeciwłupieżowa
pt: Anticaspa
sk: Protilupinová látka
sl: Sredstvo proti prhljaju
sv: Mot mjäll

en: Antifoaming
cs: Odpěňovací přísada
da: Skumhæmmer
de: Schaumvermindernd
el: Αντιαφριστικό
es: Antiespumante
et: Vahuvastane aine
fi: Vaahdonestoaine
fr: Agent antimousse
hu: Habzásgátló anyag
it: Antischiumogeno
lt: Antiputodaris
lv: Pretputošanas viela
nl: Antischuim
pl: Przeciwpieniąca
pt: Antiespuma
sk: Protipenivá látka
sl: Sredstvo proti penjenju
sv: Antiskumbildare

en: Antimicrobial
ar: مضاد للميكروبات
bg: Антимикробен
cs: Antimikrobiální přísada
da: Antimikrobiel
de: Antimikrobiell
el: Αντιμικροβιακό
es: Antimicrobiano
et: Mikroobivastane aine
fi: Antimikrobinen aine
fr: Agent antimicrobien
he: אנטי מיקרוביאלי
hi: सूक्ष्म जीवाणुरोधी
hu: Baktériumelleni szer
id: Antimikroba
it: Antimicrobico
ja: 抗菌
ko: 항균제
lt: Antimikrobinė medžiaga
lv: Pretmikrobu viela
nl: Antimicrobieel
pl: Przeciwdrobnoustrojowa
pt: Antimicrobiano
ro: Antimicrobian
ru: Антимикробный
sk: Antimikrobiálna látka
sl: Protimikrobno sredstvo
sv: Antimikrobiell
tr: Antimikrobiyal
zh: 抗菌剂

en: Antioxidant
ar: مضاد للأكسدة
bg: Антиоксидант
cs: Antioxidant
da: Antioxidant
de: Antioxidationsmittel
el: Αντιοξειδωτικό
es: Antioxidante
et: Antioksüdant
fi: Antioksidantti
fr: Antioxydant
he: נוגד חמצון
hi: एंटीऑक्सीडेंट
hu: Antioxidáns
id: Antioksidan
it: Antiossidante
ja: 抗酸化剤
ko: 항산화제
lt: Antioksidatorius
lv: Antioksidants
nl: Antioxidant
pl: Przeciwutleniająca, Przeciwutleniacz
pt: Antioxidante
ro: Antioxidant
ru: Антиоксидант
sk: Antioxidant
sl: Antioksidant
sv: Antioxiderande
tr: Antioksidan
zh: 抗氧化剂

en: Antiperspirant
de: Entfernt unerwünschte körperhaare.
el: Απορροφητικα
es: Antitranspirante
et: Aitab vältida hambakatu teket.
fr: Agent antiperspirant
hu: A termék alkalmazása után a bőrön, a hajon vagy a körmön összefüggő filmréteget alakít ki.
it: Antischiuma
lt: Antiperspirantas
lv: Uztur ādu labā stāvoklī. ādu nomierinoša viela
pl: Przeciwpotowa
pt: Antitranspirante
sk: Antiperspiračná látka
sl: Sredstvo proti znojenju

en: Antiplaque
cs: Deodorační přísada
de: Geschmeidig machend
el: Αποσμητικα
es: Antiplaca
et: Hüdrotroop
fr: Agent antiplaque
hu: Kellemes frissességet kölcsönöz a bőrnek.
lt: Medžiaga nuo dantų akmenų susidarymo
lv: Balinoša viela
pl: Zapobiegająca powstawaniu płytki nazębnej
pt: Antiplaca
sk: Látka proti tvorbe plaku
sl: Sredstvo proti zobnim oblogam

en: Antiseborrhoeic
ar: مضاد للزهم
bg: Антисебореен
cs: Přísada proti mazotoku
da: Antiseborreisk
de: Antiseborrhoeisch
el: Αντισμηγματορροϊκό
es: Antiseborreico
et: Seborröavastane aine
fi: Rasvoittumista estävä aine
fr: Antiséborrhéique
he: אנטי סבוריאה
hi: एंटीसेबोरहाइक
hu: Faggyúképződés-gátló anyag
id: Anti-seboroik
it: Antiseborroico
ja: 抗脂漏性
ko: 항지루성
lt: Antiriebalinė medžiaga
lv: Pretseborejas viela
nl: Sebumwerende stof
pl: Przeciwłojotokowa
pt: Anti-seborreico
ro: Anti-seborrheic
ru: Антисеборейный
sk: Látka proti tvorbe kožného mazu
sl: Antiseboroik
sv: Antiseborreisk
tr: Antiseboreik
zh: 抗皮脂溢

en: Antistatic
ar: مضاد للكهرباء الساكنة
bg: Антистатичен
cs: Antistatická přísada
da: Antistatisk
de: Antistatisch
el: Αντιστατικό
es: Antiestático
et: Antistaatik
fi: Antistaattinen aine
fr: Agent antistatique
he: אנטיסטטי
hi: एंटीस्टैटिक
hu: Antisztatizáló szer
id: Antistatik
it: Antistatico
ja: 静電気防止剤
ko: 정전기 방지제
lt: Antistatikas
lv: Antistatiska viela
nl: Antistatisch
pl: Antystatyczna
pt: Antiestático
ro: Antistatic
ru: Антистатик
sk: Antistatická látka
sl: Antistatik
sv: Antistatisk
tr: Antistatik
zh: 抗静电

en: Astringent
cs: Astringentní přísada
da: Astringerende
de: Adstringierend
el: Στυπτικό
es: Astringente
et: Kootav aine
fi: Supistava aine
fr: Agent astringent
hu: Összehúzó anyag
it: Astringente
lt: Standinamoji medžiaga
lv: Audus savelkoša viela
nl: Adstringerend
pl: Sciągająca
pt: Adstringente
sk: Adstringentná látka
sl: Adstringens
sv: Adstringerande

en: Binding
cs: Pojivo
da: Bindemiddel
de: Bindend
el: Συνδετικό
es: Aglutinantes
et: Sideaine
fi: Sideaine
fr: Liant
hu: Kötőanyag
it: Legante
lt: Rišiklis
lv: Saistviela
nl: Bindmiddel
pl: Wiążąca
pt: Ligante
sk: Spojivová látka
sl: Vezivo
sv: Bindemedel

en: Bleaching
cs: Odbarvovací přísada
da: Blegemiddel
de: Bleichend
el: Λευκαντικό
es: Blanqueante
et: Pleegitusaine
fi: Valkaiseva aine
fr: Agent de blanchiment
hu: Fehérítő anyag
it: Depigmentante
lt: Baliklis
nl: Bleekmiddel
pl: Rozjaśniająca
pt: Descolorante
sk: Bieliaca látka
sl: Belilo
sv: Blekande

en: Buffering
da: Bevarer huden i god stand.
de: Haarwellend oder -glättend
es: Tamponante
et: Kelaativaine
fr: Agent tampon
hu: Hajkondicionáló anyag
lt: Buferinės medžiagos
nl: Buffer
pl: Buforująca
sk: Pufračná látka
sl: Pufer
sv: Hårfärgande färgar håret.

en: Bulking
cs: Přísada ke snížení objemové hmotnosti
da: Volumenforøgelse
de: Quellend
el: Μείωση πυκνότητας
es: Voluminador
et: Mahuaine
fi: Ominaistiheyttä säätelevä aine
fr: Agent de foisonnement
hu: Duzzasztó szer
it: Volumizzante
lt: Tūrinio tankio mažinimo medžiaga
lv: Apjomu palielinoša viela
nl: Bulkmiddel
pl: Spęczniająca
pt: Agente de volume
sk: Objemová látka
sl: Sredstvo za povečanje prostornine
sv: Bulkmedel

en: Chelating
cs: Chelatační činidlo
da: Chelaterende
de: Chelatbildend
el: Δημιουργία χηλικών ενώσεων
es: Quelante
et: Kelaativ aine
fi: Kelatoiva aine
fr: Agent de chélation
hu: Kelátképző anyag
it: Chelante
lt: Kompleksionas
lv: Helātus veidojoša viela
nl: Chelaatvormer
pl: Chelatująca
pt: Quelante
sk: Chelatačná látka
sl: Kelator
sv: Komplexbildare

en: Cleansing
cs: Čistící přísada
da: Rengørende
de: Reinigend
el: Καθαριστικό
es: Limpiador
et: Puhastav aine
fi: Puhdistava aine
fr: Agent nettoyant
hu: Lemosó anyag
it: Detergente
lt: Valiklis
lv: Tīroša viela
nl: Reinigingsmiddel
pl: Oczyszczająca
pt: Purificante
sk: Čistiaca látka
sl: Sredstvo za čiščenje
sv: Rengörande

en: Cosmetic colorant
ar: صبغة تجميلية
bg: Козметичен оцветител
cs: Kosmetické barvivo
da: Kosmetisk farvestof
de: Kosmetischer farbstoff
el: Χρωστική καλλυντικών
es: Colorante cosmético
et: Kosmeetiline värvaine
fi: Kosmetiikan väriaine
fr: Colorant cosmétique
he: צבע קוסמטי
hi: कॉस्मेटिक रंग
hu: Kozmetikai színezék
id: Pewarna kosmetik
it: Colorante cosmetico
ja: 化粧品着色料
ko: 화장품 착색제
lt: Kosmetinis dažiklis
lv: Kosmētikas krāsviela
nl: Cosmetische kleurstof
pl: Barwnik kosmetyczny
pt: Corante cosmético
ro: Colorant cosmetic
ru: Косметический краситель
sk: Kozmetické farbivo
sl: Kozmetično barvilo
sv: Kosmetiskt färgämne
tr: Kozmetik renklendirici
zh: 化妆品着色剂